Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-143
Obligation of claimant to furnish information to other lien claimant; damages; applicability of section.

(1) A prime contractor, on request, is obligated to furnish the following information within a reasonable time, not exceeding ten days, to any person entitled to claim a lien through him or her:

(a) A description of the real estate being improved sufficient to identify it;

(b) The name and address of the contracting owner with whom the prime contractor contracted; and

(c) Whether there is a surety bond and, if so, the name of the surety.

(2) At the request of any person who may claim a lien through him or her, any claimant other than a prime contractor must furnish, within a reasonable time not exceeding five days, the name of the person who contracted for the furnishing by the claimant of the materials or services in connection with which the lien claim may arise.

(3) A person who fails to furnish information as required by this section is liable to the requesting party for actual damages or two hundred dollars as liquidated damages.

(4) This section shall apply only when the real estate improvement contract is with a protected party.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 19.